hr-HR: Stil Power Stalak: Kombinirani / višenamjenski stalak; Sklopivi stalak; Puni power stalak; Kombinacija funkcionalnog trenažera; Polustalak; Konstrukcija; Kombinacija sa Smith spravom; Stalak za uštedu prostora; Stalak za čučnjeve; Zidni stalak; Ostalo
it: Stile del portabottiglie: Rack combinato / all-in-one; Rack pieghevole; Power rack completo; Combinazione functional trainer; Half rack; Struttura; Combinazione multipower; Rack salvaspazio; Supporto per squat; Rack da parete; Altro
ja: パワーラックスタイル: コンボ / オールインワンラック; 折りたたみラック; フルパワーラック; ファンクショナルトレーナーコンボ; ハーフラック; リグ; スミスマシンコンボ; 省スペースラック; スクワットスタンド; 壁掛けラック; その他
pl: Styl racka treningowego: Klatka combo / all-in-one; Składana klatka treningowa; Pełna klatka treningowa; Klatka z wyciągami funkcjonalnymi; Półklatka (half rack); Konstrukcja typu Rig; Klatka z maszyną Smitha; Klatka oszczędzająca miejsce; Stojaki do przysiadów; Klatka montowana do ściany; Inne
nl: Power rack stijl: Combo/all-in-one-rek; Opvouwbaar rek; Volledig power-rek; Functional trainer-combo; Half-rek; Rig; Smith-machine-combo; Ruimtebesparend rek; Squat-standaard; Aan de muur gemonteerd rek; Overig
hu: Súlyemelő „power rack” stílusa: Kombinált / all-in-one állvány; Összecsukható állvány; Teljes erőkeret; Funkcionális edzőkeret kombó; Félkeret; Többfunkciós edzőkeret (Rig); Erőkeret Smith-géppel; Helytakarékos állvány; Guggolóállvány; Falra szerelhető állvány; Egyéb
ro-RO: Stil plută cu motor: Cadru combinat / all-in-one; Cadru pliabil; Cadru de forță complet; Combinație antrenor funcțional; Semicadru; Structură de antrenament (rig); Combinație aparat Smith; Cadru pentru economisirea spațiului; Suport pentru genuflexiuni; Cadru montat pe perete; Altele
pt-BR: Power rack estilo: Gaiola combinada / multifuncional; Gaiola dobrável; Gaiola de força completa; Combinação de treino funcional; Meia gaiola; Estrutura (Rig); Combinação de máquina Smith; Gaiola com economia de espaço; Suporte para agachamento; Gaiola montada na parede; Outros
cs: Styl silového stojanu: Kombinovaná klec / All-in-one; Skládací klec; Plná posilovací klec; Kombinace s funkčním trenérem; Poloviční klec; Konstrukce (Rig); Kombinace se Smithovým strojem; Prostorově úsporná klec; Stojan na dřepy; Klec na stěnu; Jiné
th: สไตล์โต๊ะทานอาหารไฟฟ้า: คอมโบแร็ค / แร็คอเนกประสงค์; แร็คแบบพับได้; ฟูลพาวเวอร์แร็ค; เครื่องฝึกกล้ามเนื้อแบบผสม; ฮาล์ฟแร็ค; ริก; สมิธแมชชีนคอมโบ; แร็คประหยัดพื้นที่; สแตนสควอท; แร็คติดผนัง; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu giá đỡ tạ: Giá tập kết hợp / tất cả trong một; Giá tập gập; Khung gánh tạ toàn diện; Kết hợp máy tập đa năng; Khung tạ bán diện; Giàn tập; Kết hợp máy Smith; Giá tập tiết kiệm không gian; Giá đỡ squat; Giá tập gắn tường; Khác
sv: Stil för power rack: Kombination / allt-i-ett-rack; Hopfällbart rack; Fullt power rack; Kombination med kryssdrag/functional trainer; Half rack; Rigg; Kombination med Smithmaskin; Utrymmesbesparande rack; Knäböjsställning; Väggmonterat rack; Annat
de: Art des Power Racks: Kombi-/All-in-One-Rack; Faltbares Rack; Vollwertiges Power Rack; Kabelzug-Kombi; Half Rack; Rig; Multipressen-Kombi; Platzsparendes Rack; Kniebeugenständer; Wandmontiertes Rack; Sonstige
zh-CN: 深蹲架款式: 组合 / 多功能训练架; 折叠训练架; 全框深蹲架; 功能性训练组合架; 半框深蹲架; 综合训练架; 史密斯机组合架; 节省空间训练架; 深蹲架; 壁挂式训练架; 其他
el: Τύπος διάταξης προπόνησης: Combo / All-in-one rack; Αναδιπλούμενο rack; Πλήρες power rack; Combo λειτουργικής προπόνησης; Half rack; Rig; Combo με μηχάνημα Smith; Rack εξοικονόμησης χώρου; Ορθοστάτες squat; Επιτοίχιο rack; Άλλο
pt-PT: Estilo de suporte de potência: Rack combo/tudo-em-um; Rack dobrável; Power rack completo; Combo de treino funcional; Meio rack; Equipamento; Combo de máquina Smith; Rack economizadora de espaço; Suporte de agachamento; Rack de montagem na parede; Outro
sk-SK: Štýl posilňovacieho stojana: Kombinovaná klietka/all-in-one; Skladacia klietka; Plná posilňovacia klietka; Kombinácia s funkčným trenažérom; Polovičná klietka; Konštrukcia (Rig); Kombinácia so Smithovým strojom; Priestorovo úsporná klietka; Stojan na drepy; Nástenná klietka; Iná
zh-TW: 深蹲架款式: 綜合 / 多功能訓練架; 摺疊訓練架; 全框式訓練架; 功能性訓練架組合; 半框式訓練架; 體能訓練架; 史密斯機組合; 省空間訓練架; 深蹲架; 壁掛式訓練架; 其他
ko: 파워랙 방식: 콤보/올인원 랙; 접이식 랙; 풀 파워 랙; 펑셔널 트레이너 콤보; 하프 랙; 리그; 스미스 머신 콤보; 공간 절약형 랙; 스쿼트 스탠드; 벽걸이형 랙; 기타
es: Estilo de jaula de entrenamiento: Rack combinado / todo en uno; Rack plegable; Rack de potencia completo; Combo de entrenamiento funcional; Medio rack; Estructura (rig); Combo con máquina Smith; Rack que ahorra espacio; Soporte para sentadillas; Rack de montaje en pared; Otro
fi: Voimahäkin rakennetyyppi: Yhdistelmä- / all-in-one-teline; Taitettava teline; Täysi voimahäkki; Toiminnallinen taljalaiteyhdistelmä; Puolihäkki; Kehikko; Smith-laiteyhdistelmä; Tilaa säästävä teline; Kyykkyteline; Seinään kiinnitettävä teline; Muu
lt-LT: Jėgos stovo tipas: Kombinuotas / universalus stovas; Sulankstomas stovas; Pilnas jėgos stovas; Kombinuotas funkcinis treniruoklis; Pusinis stovas; Treniruočių rėmas; Kombinuotas Smito treniruoklis; Kompaktiškas stovas; Pritūpimų stovas; Prie sienos tvirtinamas stovas; Kita
fr: Type de rack de musculation: Cage combinée / tout-en-un; Cage pliable; Cage de musculation complète; Combiné avec poulie vis-à-vis; Demi-cage (half rack); Structure (rig); Combiné avec machine Smith; Cage peu encombrante; Chandelles de squat; Cage murale; Autre
bg-BG: Стил на силова стойка: Комбинирана / мултифункционална стойка; Сгъваема стойка; Пълна силова стойка (Power rack); Комбинация с функционален тренажор; Полустойка (Half rack); Конструкция (Rig); Комбинация със Смит машина; Компактна стойка; Стойка за клек; Стенна стойка; Друго
tr: Power rack stili: Kombine / hepsi bir arada kabin; Katlanır raf; Tam güç kafesi; Fonksiyonel çalışma istasyonu kombosu; Yarım kafes; İstasyon; Smith makinesi kombosu; Yerden tasarruf sağlayan raf; Squat sehpası; Duvara monte kafes; Diğer
en: Power rack style: Combo / all-in-one rack; Folding rack; Full power rack; Functional trainer combo; Half rack; Rig; Smith machine combo; Space-saving rack; Squat stand; Wall-mounted rack; Other
ru: Стиль силовой рамы: Комбинированная / универсальная стойка; Складная стойка; Полная силовая рама; Комбинированная функциональная рама; Полурама; Функциональная рама; Стойка с машиной Смита; Компактная стойка; Стойка для приседаний; Настенная стойка; Другое
sl-SI: Stil kletke za uteži: Kombinirana/večnamenska kletka; Zložljiva kletka; Polna kletka (power rack); Kombinacija s funkcionalno napravo; Polovična kletka; Konstrukcija (rig); Kombinacija z napravo Smith; Prostorsko varčna kletka; Stojalo za počepe; Stenska kletka; Drugo
da: Power rack-stil: Kombineret / alt i ét-stativ; Foldbart stativ; Fuldt power rack; Functional trainer-kombination; Half rack; Rig; Smith-stativ-kombination; Pladsbesparende stativ; Squat-stativ; Vægmonteret stativ; Andet
nb: Stil på styrkestativ: Kombi-/alt-i-ett-stativ; Sammenleggbart stativ; Fullt powerrack; Kombinert kryssdrag; Half rack; Rig; Kombinert Smith-maskin; Plassbesparende stativ; Knebøystativ; Veggmontert stativ; Annet